Florida, session 2026, SB58.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 30 31 Section 1.âSection 501.961, Florida Statutes, is created to 32 read: 33 501.961âAnimal cremation.â 34 (1)âSHORT TITLE.âThis section may be cited as âSevillaâs 35 Law.â 36 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 37 (a)ââCommingling of significant amounts of cremation 38 remains from different companion animalsâ means the commingling 39 of remains such that specific cremation remains cannot be 40 attributed to a particular animal or the cremation remains 41 attributed to one companion animal contain more than 1 percent 42 by weight of cremation remains from one or more other companion 43 animals. The term does not include the presence of, in the 44 cremation remains of a companion animal, the remains of any 45 creature that was on or contained within the body of that animal 46 at the time of cremation, including parasites, insects, food, or 47 creatures eaten by that companion animal. 48 (b)ââCommunal cremationâ means a cremation process in which 49 companion animals are cremated together without effective 50 partitions or separation during the cremation process such that 51 the commingling of significant amounts of cremation remains from 52 different companion animals is likely or certain to occur. 53 (c)ââCompanion animalâ or âanimalâ means a deceased animal 54 that had a companion relationship or a pet relationship with its 55 owner at the time of the animalâs death. 56 (d)ââCremation remainsâ means the material remaining after 57 the cremation of an animal, which may include ashes, skeletal 58 remains, and other residue resulting from the incineration 59 process, and which may be pulverized or otherwise processed by 60 the provider of cremation services. 61 (e)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Agriculture and 62 Consumer Services. 63 (f)ââIndividually partitioned cremationâ means a cremation 64 process in which the commingling of significant amounts of 65 cremation remains from different companion animals is unlikely 66 to occur and: 67 1.âOnly one companion animal at a time is cremated in the 68 incinerator; or 69 2.âMore than one companion animal is cremated in the 70 incinerator at the same time, but each of the animals is 71 completely separated from the others by partitions during the 72 cremation process. 73 (g)ââOn a regular basisâ means that the person or business 74 entity referring animal owners or bringing business to a 75 provider: 76 1.âHas an ongoing contractual or agency relationship with 77 the provider relating to the cremation of companion animals; 78 2.âRegularly receives compensation or consideration from 79 the provider or animal owners relating to the cremation of 80 companion animals by the provider; or 81 3.âRefers or brings to the provider the business of more 82 than five animal owners in an average month. 83 (h)ââProviderâ means a person, company, or other entity 84 engaging in the business of cremating deceased companion animals 85 in this state. 86 (3)âWRITTEN DESCRIPTION OF SERVICES.â 87 (a)âA provider of companion animal cremation services 88 shall, without charge, provide to all of the following a written 89 description of the services the provider offers: 90 1.âThe owner of each deceased animal for whom the provider 91 agrees to provide cremation services, or the person making 92 cremation arrangements on the ownerâs behalf. 93 2.âAll veterinarians, pet shops, and other business 94 entities or persons known to the provider who refer animal 95 owners or bring deceased animals to the provider on a regular 96 basis. 97 3.âThe department. 98 4.âAny other person, upon request. 99 (b)âThe written description of services: 100 1.âMay be in the form of a brochure; 101 2.âMust be provided in quantities sufficient to allow its 102 distribution to animal owners whose business is being referred 103 or brought to the provider; 104 3.âMust include a detailed explanation of each service 105 provided for each type or level of cremation service offered. If 106 any part of the deceased companion animal will be removed, used, 107 or sold by the provider before or after the cremation, the 108 written description of services must disclose that fact; and 109 4.âMay not include false or misleading information. A 110 written description of services is misleading if it: 111 a.âFails to include a detailed explanation of the cremation 112 services offered or fails to include, for each type or level of 113 cremation service offered, any of the disclosures required under 114 this subsection; 115 b.âUses the terms âprivateâ or âindividualâ with respect to 116 any communal cremation procedure or with respect to an 117 individually partitioned cremation procedure that will cremate 118 more than one companion animal at the same time; 119 c.âUses the terms âindividually partitionedâ or âseparateâ 120 with respect to a communal cremation process; or 121 d.âIncludes any text, picture, illustration, or combination 122 thereof, or uses any layout, typography, or color scheme, which 123 reasonably causes confusion about the nature of the services to 124 be provided or obstructs certain parts of the written 125 description of services. 126 (4)âBUSINESS ENTITIES OR PERSONS REFERRING OR BRINGING 127 BUSINESS TO A PROVIDER.â 128 (a)âA veterinarian, pet shop, or other business entity or 129 person referring owners of deceased animals, or persons making 130 arrangements on an ownerâs behalf, to a provider on a regular 131 basis shall, at the time of the referral, make a copy of the 132 providerâs written description of services available to such 133 person. 134 (b)âA veterinarian, pet shop, or other business entity or 135 person accepting, on a regular basis, deceased companion animals 136 for cremation through services obtained from a provider shall 137 make a copy of the providerâs written description of services 138 available to each animal owner, or person making arrangements on 139 the ownerâs behalf, from whom a deceased companion animal is 140 accepted. 141 (c)âA copy of the written description of services may be 142 given to the animal owner, or the person making arrangements on 143 the ownerâs behalf, at the time the services are offered. 144 (d)âFor purposes of this subsection, publishing or 145 otherwise disseminating advertising for a provider of companion 146 animal cremation services does not, in and of itself, constitute 147 referring or bringing business to that provider. 148 (5)âCERTIFICATION; PENALTY FOR FALSE CERTIFICATION.âIf a 149 providerâs services include the return of the cremation remains 150 of the animal, the provider must include a certification along 151 with the returned cremation remains. The certification must 152 declare that, to the best of the providerâs knowledge and 153 belief, except as otherwise specifically indicated on the 154 certificate, the cremation and any other services specified were 155 provided in accordance with the representations of the provider 156 in the applicable portions of the providerâs written description 157 of services. 158 (6)âUNLAWFUL ACTS.âIt is unlawful for a provider: 159 (a)âTo prepare or distribute a written description of 160 services which the provider knows or should know to be false or 161 misleading. A first offense is punishable by a fine of at least 162 $1,000 but not more than $1,500, and each subsequent offense is 163 punishable by a fine of at least $2,000 but not more than 164 $2,500. 165 (b)âTo intentionally fail to prepare or distribute a 166 written description of services as required by this section. A 167 first offense is punishable by a fine of at least $1,000 but not 168 more than $1,500, and each subsequent offense is punishable by a 169 fine of at least $2,000 but not more than $2,500. 170 (c)âTo knowingly make a false certification under 171 subsection (5). A first offense is punishable by a fine of at 172 least $1,000 but not more than $1,500, and each subsequent 173 offense is punishable by a fine of at least $2,000 but not more 174 than $2,500. 175 (7)âVIOLATION AS A DECEPTIVE ACT OR PRACTICE OR UNFAIR 176 TRADE PRACTICE.âIn addition to any fine imposed under subsection 177 (6), a person who commits an act or a practice declared to be 178 unlawful under subsection (6) or who violates this section 179 commits an unfair method of competition or an unfair or 180 deceptive act or practice in violation of part II of this 181 chapter and is subject to the penalties and remedies provided 182 for such violations. 183 (8)âPRIVATE RIGHT OF ACTION.âIn addition to any other 184 penalties or remedies provided by law, a person injured by a 185 violation of this section may bring a civil action to recover 186 damages or punitive damages, including costs, court costs, and 187 attorney fees. This subsection may not be construed to limit any 188 right or remedy provided under law. 189 (9)âPOWERS OF THE DEPARTMENT.â 190 (a)âThe department may conduct an investigation of any 191 person or provider if there is an appearance that, either upon 192 complaint or otherwise, a violation of this section or of any 193 rule adopted or order issued pursuant to this section has been 194 committed or is about to be committed. 195 (b)âThe department may issue and serve subpoenas and 196 subpoenas duces tecum to compel the attendance of witnesses and 197 the production of all books, accounts, records, and other 198 documents and materials relevant to an examination or 199 investigation. The department, or its duly authorized 200 representative, may administer oaths and affirmations to any 201 person. 202 (c)âThe department may enter an order imposing one or more 203 of the penalties set forth in subsection (6) if the department 204 finds that a provider or a person or business entity that refers 205 animal owners to a provider, or an agent, a servant, or an 206 employee thereof on a regular basis: 207 1.âViolated or is operating in violation of this section or 208 department rule or order; 209 2.âRefused or failed, or any of its principal officers 210 refused or failed, after notice, to produce any record of such 211 provider, person, or business entity or to disclose any 212 information required to be disclosed under this section or 213 department rules; or 214 3.âMade a materially false statement in response to any 215 department request or investigation. 216 (d)âUpon a finding as set forth in paragraph (c), the 217 department may enter an order doing one or more of the 218 following: 219 1.âIssuing a notice of noncompliance pursuant to s. 220 120.695. 221 2.âIssuing a cease and desist order that directs the 222 provider, person, or business entity to cease and desist 223 specified activities. 224 3.âImposing an administrative fine in the Class II category 225 pursuant to s. 570.971 for each act or omission. 226 4.âImposing an administrative fine in the Class III 227 category pursuant to s. 570.971 for each act or omission that 228 involves fraud or deception. 229 (e)âExcept as otherwise provided in this section, the 230 administrative proceedings that could result in the entry of an 231 order imposing any of the penalties specified in paragraph (d) 232 are governed by chapter 120. 233 (f)âAll fines collected by the department under paragraph 234 (d) must be paid into the General Inspection Trust Fund. 235 (10)âRULEMAKING AUTHORITY.âThe department may adopt rules 236 pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement this section. 237 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.